src/fst/stems/verb_stems.lexc
LEXICON IMP-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-is-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-isi-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-si-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0s-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-POT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POT@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3SG-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3SG-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-SS-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-0i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-sii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-TR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-is-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-si-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-sis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0i-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0s-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.SUPERASPECT.REP@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-isis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.S@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON Intransitive
ditsuw[be_yellow]:di.tsuw	INTR-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os01035, os01036, os01037
istsìn[defecate]:ná=chish	INTR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06855
iyistsàd:i=tsàd	INTR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07452
k'adìniswùsh[finish_whistling]:k'a=dìni.wùsh	INTR-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06729, os06730, os06731, os06732, os06733, os06734
kútsìstà[put_head_in]:kútsì=tón	INTR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11906
nishò[grow_up]:ni.shón	INTR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os01403, os01404, os01405, os01406, os01407, os01408, os01409
nàguʔó[quiet_down]:nà=gu_ʔón	INTR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11754, os11755, os11756, os11761
nànó[arrive_and_camp]:nà=nó	INTR-nii-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07922, os07923, os07924
nààtsá[make_Sundance]:nà=tsá	INTR-ii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09722, os09723, os09724, os09725
nádidús[crawl_down]:ná=di.dús	INTR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02615
nádìyitsàd[become_crazy]:ná=dìyi.tsàd	INTR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os04974
nádìł[drink_things]]:ná=dìł	INTR-i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09125
nágudítłód[jump_off]:ná=gu_dì.tłiizh	INTR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06453
nástsil[get_drenched]:ná=tsil	INTR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os02220, os02221
náya[one_get_up]:ná.ya	INTR-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os09110
nááyi[melt]:ná=yí	INTR-sii-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03007
nìkádidáł[come_back_down]:nìkáná=di.dàł	INTR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os12082
sidó[one_sit]:dò	INTR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06938, os06939, os06940, os06944
sists'íy:ts'íy	INTR-sis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os03582
tadìstì[be_in_air]:ta=dì.tíł	INTR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06624
tadìstó[be_in_air]:ta=dì.tó	INTR-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06622
tatł'ash[dance]:ta=tł'ash	INTR-0i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os00929
tatł'átsós[get_tangled_in_rope]:tatł'á=tsós	INTR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os09787, os09788
ts'ásikima[be_straight]:ts'á.kima	INTR-si-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os07257, os07258, os07259
tsigusʔit[become_wealthy]:tsi=gu_ʔit	INTR-nis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11981, os11982
ìwún[be_ready]:wún	INTR-isi-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os03309, os03310, os03311, os03312, os03313, os03314, os03315
ììtł'ód[give_out_running]:ìì=tł'ód	INTR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os08799
íchàch'igudlììzh[be_disgusted]:íchàch'i=gu_dlììzh	INTR-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10232, os10233, os10234
ídiskid[ask_O]:ná=í_di.kiizh	INTR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os05504
ít'ùd[smoke]:í.t'ùd	INTR-is-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os07024, os07025, os07026
íyìni[be_jealous]:í=yì.ni	INTR-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04990, os04991, os04992, os04993, os04994, os04995, os04996
LEXICON Transitive
istsin[smell_O]:tsin	TR-is-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10738, os10739
istsin[smell_O]:tsít	TR-isis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06870
nàditł'is[start_throw_SO_down]:nà=di.tł'os	TR-sis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06363
nàstín[place_AO]:nà=tín	TR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06564
násʔín[look_at_O]:ní=ná.ʔìsh	TR-0i-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os00503
sití[one_sleep]:tí	TR-si-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os08864, os08865
tadiʔò[hold_RO_up]:ta=di.ʔón	TR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os00712, os00713, os00714, os00715, os00716, os00717, os00718
yiló[invite]:ná=yi.làsh	TR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os07524
àdinì[feel_O_with_hand]:á=di.nì	TR-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04642, os04643, os04644, os04645
àdistsid[shove_O]:nádi.chish	TR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06017, os06018, os06019
àstsíd[push_O_away]:à=tsíd	TR-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10435, os10436
álá[do]:á=lá	TR-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11120
ìnìschid[kick_O]:ì.chid	TR-nis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os11828, os11830
ìtsàł[hit_with_RO]:tsàł	TR-i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10982, os10983
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09238, os09239, os09240, os09241, os09244
ízùd[swallow_O]:zùd	TR-ii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04831, os04832
